Idaho, session 2025, H0309.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6617, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-6618, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-6619, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 4. That Section 67-6619A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-6620, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 67-6621, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 67-6622, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That the Heading for Chapter 66, Title 67, Idaho Code, be,
and the same is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 66
ELECTION CAMPAIGN CONTRIBUTIONS AND EXPENDITURES -- LOBBYISTS
SECTION 9. That Section 67-6602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6602. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) "Candidate" means an individual who seeks nomination, election, or
reelection to public office and who has taken any of the following actions:
(a) Announced the individual's candidacy publicly;
(b) Filed for public office;
(c) Received a contribution for the purpose of promoting the individ-
ual's candidacy for office; or
(d) Made an expenditure, contracted for services, or reserved space
with the intent of promoting the individual's candidacy for office.
For purposes of this chapter, an incumbent shall be presumed to be a can-
didate in the subsequent election for his or her office until the in-
cumbent has failed to file a declaration of candidacy by the statutory
deadline.
(2) "Compensation" includes any advance, conveyance, forgiveness of
indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge or trans-
fer of money or anything of value, and any contract, agreement, promise or
other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, to do any of the fore-
going, for services rendered or to be rendered, but does not include reim-
bursement of expenses if such reimbursement does not exceed the amount ac-
tually expended for such expenses and is substantiated by an itemization of
such expenses.
(3) "Contractor" means a person who receives compensation from another
person for either full-time or part-time work based on a contract or compen-
sation agreement, but who is not an employee of that person.
(4) (3) "Contribution" includes any advance, conveyance, forgiveness
of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge, sub-
scription or transfer of money or anything of value, and any contract, agree-
ment, promise or other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, to
make a contribution, in support of or in opposition to any candidate, polit-


ical committee or measure. Such term also includes personal funds or other
property of a candidate or members of his household expended or transferred
to cover expenditures incurred in support of such candidate but does not in-
clude personal funds used to pay the candidate filing fee. Such term also
includes the rendering of personal and professional services for less than
full consideration, but does not include ordinary home hospitality or the
rendering of "part-time" personal services of the sort commonly performed
by volunteer campaign workers or advisors or incidental expenses not in ex-
cess of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) personally paid for by any volunteer
campaign worker. "Part-time" services, for the purposes of this definition,
means services in addition to regular full-time employment, or, in the case
of an unemployed person or persons engaged in part-time employment, services
rendered without compensation or reimbursement of expenses from any source
other than the candidate or political committee for whom such services are
rendered. For the purposes of this act, contributions, other than money or
its equivalent shall be deemed to have a money value equivalent to the fair
market value of the contribution.
(5) (4) "Election" means any state or local general, special, recall,
or primary election.
(6) (5) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in oppo-
sition to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in sup-
port of, or in opposition to, a measure.
(7)(a) (6)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any communication
broadcast by television or radio, printed in a newspaper or on a bill-
board, directly mailed or delivered by hand to personal residences, or
telephone calls made to personal residences, or otherwise distributed
that:
(i) Unambiguously refers to any candidate; and
(ii) Is broadcasted, printed, mailed, delivered, made or dis-
tributed within thirty (30) days before a primary election or
sixty (60) days before a general election; and
(iii) Is broadcasted to, printed in a newspaper, distributed to,
mailed to or delivered by hand to, telephone calls made to, or
otherwise distributed to an audience that includes members of the
electorate for such public office.
(b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(i) Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinion or com-
mentary, writings, or letter to the editor printed in a newspaper,
magazine, or other periodical not owned or controlled by a candi-
date, political committee, or political party;
(ii) Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast
facility not owned or controlled by a candidate, political commit-
tee, or political party;
(iii) Any communication by persons made in the regular course and
scope of their business or any communication made by a membership
organization solely to members of such organization and their fam-
ilies;
(iv) Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part
of the popular name of a bill or statute;


(v) A communication that constitutes an expenditure or an inde-
pendent expenditure under this chapter.
(8) (7) "Employee" means an individual who performs a service for wages
or other compensation from which the individual's employer withholds fed-
eral employment taxes under a contract for hire, written or oral.
(9) "Executive official" means:
(a) The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state con-
troller, state treasurer, attorney general, superintendent of public
instruction and any deputy or staff member of any of those individuals
who, within the course and scope of his or her employment, is directly
involved in major policy-influencing decisions for the office;
(b) A state department or agency director, deputy director, division
administrator or bureau chief as established and enumerated in sections
67-2402 and 67-2406, Idaho Code;
(c) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of any board or commission that is authorized to make rules or conduct
rulemaking activities pursuant to section 67-5201, Idaho Code;
(d) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of any board or commission that governs any of the state departments
enumerated in section 67-2402, Idaho Code, not including public school
districts;
(e) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of the Idaho public utilities commission, the Idaho industrial commis-
sion, and the Idaho state tax commission; and
(f) The members of the governing board of the state insurance fund and
the members of the governing board and the executive or chief adminis-
trative officer of the Idaho housing and finance association, the Idaho
energy resources authority, and the Idaho state building authority.
(10) (8) "Expenditure" includes any payment, contribution, subscrip-
tion, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything
of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities or anything of value
for the purpose of assisting, benefiting or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign.
(11) (9) "Independent expenditure" means any expenditure by a person
for a communication expressly advocating the election, passage or defeat of
a clearly identified candidate or measure that is not made with the coopera-
tion or with the prior consent of, or in consultation with, or at the consent
of, or in consultation with, or at the request of a suggestion of, a candidate
or any agent or authorized committee of the candidate or political committee
supporting or opposing a measure. As used in this subsection, "expressly ad-
vocating" means any communication containing a message advocating election,
passage or defeat including, but not limited to, the name of the candidate
or measure, or expression such as "vote for," "elect," "support," "cast your
ballot for," "vote against," "defeat" or "reject."
(12) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each means attempting through contacts
with, or causing others to make contact with, members of the legislature or
legislative committees or an executive official to influence the approval,


modification or rejection of any legislation by the legislature of the state
of Idaho or any committee thereof or by the governor or to develop or main-
tain relationships with, promote goodwill with, or entertain members of the
legislature or executive officials. "Lobby" and "lobbying" shall also mean
communicating with an executive official for the purpose of influencing the
consideration, amendment, adoption or rejection of any rule or rulemaking as
defined in section 67-5201, Idaho Code, or any ratemaking decision, procure-
ment, contract, bid or bid process, financial services agreement, or bond
issue. Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that association
or organization; and provided that neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes
communicating with an executive official for the purpose of carrying out
ongoing negotiations following the award of a bid or a contract, communica-
tions involving ongoing legal work and negotiations conducted by and with
attorneys for executive agencies, interactions between parties in litiga-
tion or other contested matters, or communications among and between members
of the legislature and executive officials and their employees, or by state
employees while acting in their official capacity or within the course and
scope of their employment.
(13) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies.
(14) "Lobbyist's client" means the person on whose behalf the lobbyist
is acting, directly or indirectly, as a contractor, and by whom the lobbyist
or lobbyist's employer is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(15) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons for whom a lob-
byist is an employee, and by whom the lobbyist is compensated for acting as a
lobbyist.
(16) (10) "Local government office" means any publicly elected office
for any political subdivision of the state or special district that is not a
legislative, judicial, statewide, or federal office.
(17) (11) "Measure" means any proposal submitted to the people for their
approval or rejection at an election, including any initiative, referendum,
recall election, or revision of or amendment to the state constitution. An
initiative or referendum proposal shall be deemed a measure when the attor-
ney general, county prosecutor, or city attorney, as appropriate, reviews it
and gives it a ballot title. A recall shall be deemed a measure upon approval
of the recall petition as to form pursuant to section 34-1704, Idaho Code.
(18) (12) "Nonbusiness entity" means any group of two (2) or more indi-
viduals, a corporation, association, firm, partnership, committee, club or
other organization that:
(a) Does not have as its principal purpose the conduct of business ac-
tivities for profit; and
(b) Received during the preceding or current calendar year contribu-
tions, gifts or membership fees, which in the aggregate exceeded ten
percent (10%) of its total receipts for such year.
(19) (13) "Person" means an individual, corporation, association,
firm, partnership, committee, political party, club or other organization
or group of persons.
(20) (14) "Political committee" means:
(a) Any person specifically designated to support or oppose any candi-
date or measure; or


(b) Any person who receives contributions and makes expenditures in an
amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any calendar year for
the purpose of supporting or opposing one (1) or more candidates or mea-
sures.
(c) A county, district or regional committee of a recognized politi-
cal party shall not be considered a political committee for the purposes
of this chapter unless such party committee has expenditures exceeding
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in a calendar year.
(21) (15) "Political treasurer" means an individual appointed by a can-
didate or political committee as provided in section 67-6603, Idaho Code.
(22) (16) "Public office" means any local, legislative, judicial, or
state office or position that is filled by election but does not include the
office of precinct committeeman.
SECTION 10. That Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated
as Chapter 7, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 7
LOBBYING DISCLOSURE
74-701. PURPOSE OF CHAPTER. The purpose of this chapter is:
(1) To promote public confidence in government; and
(2) To promote openness in government and to provide transparency by
those promoting or opposing legislation or attempting to influence execu-
tive or administrative actions for compensation.
74-702. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the following terms have
the following meanings:
(1) "Compensation" includes any advance, conveyance, forgiveness of
indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge, or trans-
fer of money or anything of value, and any contract, agreement, promise, or
other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, for any of the forego-
ing, for services rendered or to be rendered, but does not include reimburse-
ment of expenses if such reimbursement does not exceed the amount actually
expended for such expenses and is substantiated by an itemization of such ex-
penses.
(2) "Contractor" means a person who receives compensation from another
person for either full-time or part-time work based on a contract or compen-
sation agreement, but who is not an employee of that person.
(3) "Employee" means an individual who performs a service for wages or
other compensation from which the individual's employer withholds federal
employment taxes under a contract for hire, written or oral.
(4) "Executive official" means:
(a) The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state con-
troller, state treasurer, attorney general, superintendent of public
instruction, and any deputy or staff member of any of those individuals
who, within the course and scope of employment, is directly involved in
major policy-influencing decisions for the office;


(b) A state department or agency director, deputy director, division
administrator, or bureau chief as established and enumerated in sec-
tions 67-2402 and 67-2406, Idaho Code;
(c) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of any board or commission that is authorized to make rules or conduct
rulemaking activities pursuant to section 67-5201, Idaho Code;
(d) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of any board or commission that governs any of the state departments
enumerated in section 67-2402, Idaho Code, not including public school
districts;
(e) The membership and the executive or chief administrative officer
of the Idaho public utilities commission, the Idaho industrial commis-
sion, and the Idaho state tax commission; and
(f) The members of the governing board of the state insurance fund and
the members of the governing board and the executive or chief adminis-
trative officer of the Idaho housing and finance association, the Idaho
energy resources authority, and the Idaho state building authority.
(5) "Expenditure" includes any payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value,
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally en-
forceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also includes a
promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in exchange for
goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for the purpose
of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or
assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign.
(6) "Lobby" or "lobbying" means attempting through contacts with, or
causing others to make contact with, members of the legislature or legisla-
tive committees or an executive official to influence the approval, modifi-
cation, or rejection of any legislation by the Idaho legislature or any com-
mittee thereof or by the governor or to educate, develop, or maintain rela-
tionships with, promote goodwill with, or entertain members of the legisla-
ture or executive officials. "Lobby" and "lobbying" shall also include in-
direct contacts and attempts to influence legislation by attempting to af-
fect the opinion of the public with respect to legislation and encouraging
the audience to take action with respect to legislation. "Lobby" or "lob-
bying" also means communicating with an executive official for the purpose
of influencing the consideration, amendment, adoption, or rejection of any
rule or rulemaking as defined in section 67-5201, Idaho Code, or any ratemak-
ing decision, procurement, contract, bid or bid process, financial services
agreement, or bond issue. Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an as-
sociation's or other organization's act of communicating with the members
of that association or organization; and neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" in-
cludes communicating with an executive official for the purpose of carrying
out ongoing negotiations following the award of a bid or a contract, communi-
cations involving ongoing legal work and negotiations conducted by and with
attorneys for executive agencies, interactions between parties in litiga-
tion or other contested matters, or communications among and between members
of the legislature and executive officials and their employees, or by state
employees while acting in their official capacity or within the course and
scope of their employment.


(7) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies.
(8) "Lobbyist's client" means the person on whose behalf the lobbyist
is acting, directly or indirectly, as a contractor, and by whom the lobbyist
or lobbyist's employer is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(9) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person for whom a lobbyist is an em-
ployee and by whom the lobbyist is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(10) "Person" means an individual, corporation, association, firm,
partnership, committee, political party, club or other organization or
group of persons.
74-703. REGISTRATION OF LOBBYISTS. (1) Before doing any lobbying, or
within thirty (30) days after being employed, designated, or contracted as
a lobbyist, whichever occurs first, a lobbyist shall register by filing with
the secretary of state a lobbyist registration statement, in such detail as
the secretary of state shall prescribe, accompanied by payment of a regis-
tration fee of ten dollars ($10.00) to be deposited by the secretary of state
in the state treasury. The lobbyist registration statement shall include:
(a) The lobbyist's name, permanent business address, and any temporary
residential and business address in Ada county during the legislative
session;
(b) The name, address, and notification email address to be used under
section 74-705(2), Idaho Code, for the employer, client, or designated
contact, as well as the general nature of the occupation or business of
the lobbyist's employer or client, and the duration of the employment or
contract;
(c) In the case of a designated lobbyist for a corporate entity as de-
scribed in section 74-704(7), Idaho Code, the name and notification
email address of the corporate entity that is already registered as a
lobbyist and for whom the designated lobbyist will be reporting all cor-
porate and employee activities;
(d) Whether the person from whom he receives compensation employs him
solely as a lobbyist or whether he is a regular employee performing ser-
vices for his employer that include but are not limited to lobbying of
legislation;
(e) The general subjects of the lobbyist's legislative interest; and
(f) The name and address of the person who will have custody of the ac-
counts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents required to be
kept under this chapter.
(2) Any lobbyist who receives or is to receive compensation from more
than one (1) person for his services as a lobbyist shall file a separate no-
tice of representation, accompanied by the fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for
each separate notice of representation, with respect to each such person;
except that when a lobbyist whose fee for acting as such in respect to the
same legislation or type of legislation is, or is to be, paid or contributed
by more than one (1) person, then such lobbyist may file a single statement,
in which he shall detail the name, business address and general occupation of
each person so paying or contributing.
(3) Whenever a change, modification, or termination of the lobbyist's
employment or contract occurs, the lobbyist shall, within one (1) week of
such change, modification, or termination, furnish full information regard-


ing the same by filing with the secretary of state an amended registration
statement.
(4) Each lobbyist who has registered shall file a new registration
statement, revised as appropriate, on or before each January 10, and failure
to do so shall terminate his registration.
74-704. EXEMPTION FROM REGISTRATION. The following persons and activ-
ities shall be exempt from registration and reporting under sections 74-703
and 74-705, Idaho Code:
(1) Persons who limit their lobbying activities to appearances before
public sessions of committees of the legislature or to appearances or par-
ticipation in public meetings, public hearings, or public proceedings held
or initiated by executive officials or their employees;
(2) Persons who are employees of an entity engaged in the business of
publishing, broadcasting, or televising, while engaged in the gathering and
dissemination of news and comment thereon to the general public in the ordi-
nary course of business;
(3) Persons who do not receive any compensation for lobbying and per-
sons whose compensation for lobbying does not exceed two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) in the aggregate during any calendar quarter, including
persons who lobby on behalf of their employer, and the lobbying activity
represents less than the equivalent of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) of
the employee's time per calendar year quarter, based on an hourly proration
of said employee's compensation;
(4) Members of a trade association who are acting on behalf of and at
the request of the trade association, if such association has registered as
a lobbyist pursuant to this chapter, and if any expenditures are reported by
the association pursuant to section 74-705, Idaho Code;
(5) Elected state officers, state executive officers appointed by the
governor subject to confirmation by the senate, and elected officials of po-
litical subdivisions of the state of Idaho, acting in their official capac-
ity;
(6) A person who represents a bona fide church, of which he is a member,
solely for the purpose of protecting the constitutional right to the free ex-
ercise of religion; and
(7)(a) Employees of a corporate entity, if such corporate entity:
(i) Has registered as a lobbyist pursuant to this chapter;
(ii) Has appointed one (1) or more of its employees or contractors
as its official designated lobbyist; and
(iii) The person so appointed by the corporate entity has com-
pleted the designated lobbyist registration.
(b) The corporate entity shall, through its designated lobbyist, fully
and accurately report all expenditures made by employees who are exempt
pursuant to this section in the manner and at the times required by this
chapter, and, in addition thereto, shall report the names of all employ-
ees who make expenditures in the aggregate sum of fifty dollars ($50.00)
or more during any calendar year on behalf of the corporate entity's
lobbying activities.


74-705. REPORTING BY LOBBYISTS. (1) Any lobbyist registered under
section 74-703, Idaho Code, shall file with the secretary of state a monthly
report of his lobbying activities signed by the lobbyist. The reports shall
be made in the form and manner prescribed by the secretary of state. In ad-
dition to the monthly report, every registered lobbyist shall file interim
weekly periodic reports for each week or portion thereof that the legis-
lature is in session. Monthly reports shall be filed within fifteen (15)
days of the first day of the month for the activities of the month just past.
Weekly reports shall be filed by the Monday immediately following the week in
which reported activities took place.
(2) Once a lobbyist has filed a monthly report, each person identified
as an employer, client, or designated contact on the report will be electron-
ically notified that the report has been filed by the lobbyist, using the
contact information provided for the employer, client, or designated con-
tact upon registration.
(3) Each monthly and weekly periodic report shall contain:
(a) The total of all expenditures made or incurred on behalf of such
lobbyist by the lobbyist's employers or clients, not including payments
made directly to the lobbyist, during the period covered by the report.
The totals shall be segregated according to financial category, includ-
ing but not limited to entertainment, food and refreshment, honoraria,
travel, lodging, advertising, and other like expenditures. Reimbursed
personal living and travel expenses of a lobbyist made or incurred di-
rectly or indirectly for any lobbying purpose need not be reported;
(b) The name of any legislator or executive official to whom or for
whose benefit on any one (1) occasion an expenditure in excess of one
hundred dollars ($100) per person for the purpose of lobbying is made or
incurred and the date, name of payee, purpose, and amount of such expen-
diture. Expenditures for the benefit of the members of the household of
a legislator or executive official shall also be itemized if such expen-
diture exceeds the amount listed in this subsection. The itemization
threshold in this paragraph shall be adjusted biennially by directive
of the secretary of state, using consumer price index data compiled by
the United States department of labor;
(c) In the case of a lobbyist employed by or contracted with more than
one (1) employer or client, the proportionate amount of such expendi-
tures in each category made or incurred on behalf of each of his employ-
ers or clients; and
(d) The subject matter of proposed legislation and the number of each
senate or house bill, resolution, memorial, or other legislative ac-
tivity or any rule, ratemaking decision, procurement, contract, bid or
bid process, financial services agreement or bond in which the lobby-
ist has been engaged in supporting or opposing during the reporting pe-
riod; provided that in the case of appropriations bills, the lobbyist
shall enumerate the specific section or sections that he supported or
opposed.
(4) In addition to any other reports required under this section, lob-
byists shall report to the secretary of state any expenditure of one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000) or more within forty-eight (48) hours after such ex-
penditure is made. Such report shall include the name of the lobbyist mak-


ing the expenditure, the name and address of the client or employer on whose
behalf the expenditure was made, the financial category of the expenditure,
and the date of the expenditure. However, expenditures for food and refresh-
ment are exempt from the requirements of this subsection and may be reported
as a part of the lobbyist's weekly or monthly report. Any report filed under
this subsection shall be in addition to the reporting of these expenditures
in the lobbyist's regular reports. For the purpose of determining when a re-
port should be filed under this subsection, an expenditure is made on the day
that the expenditure is publicly distributed or otherwise viewed by the pub-
lic, if applicable, or on the date payment is made, whichever is earlier.
(5) Reports required to be filed under the provisions of this section
shall be filed online with the secretary of state, except as provided in sec-
tion 74-710, Idaho Code, by no later than midnight on the date the filing is
due.
74-706. REPORTS BY STATE ENTITIES. Any office or agency of state gov-
ernment or a state-funded educational institution that offers gifts of any
kind through interaction with the legislative or executive departments of
state government shall file the same reports lobbyists are required to file
pursuant to section 74-705, Idaho Code, unless the office, agency, or state-
funded educational institution is otherwise represented by a lobbyist who
files all necessary reports and documentation as provided by law.
74-707. EMPLOYMENT OF UNREGISTERED PERSONS. It shall be a violation of
this chapter for any person to employ for pay or any consideration, or to pay
or agree to pay any compensation to, a person to lobby who is not registered
or exempt from registration under this chapter unless such person registers
as a lobbyist as provided by this chapter as soon as practicable after such
employment, payment, or agreement.
74-708. DUTIES OF LOBBYISTS. A person required to register as a lob-
byist under this chapter shall also have the following obligations, the vi-
olation of which shall constitute cause for revocation of his registration
and may subject such person and such person's employer or client, if such em-
ployer or client aids, abets, ratifies, or confirms any such violation, to
other civil liabilities as provided by this chapter:
(1) Such persons shall obtain and preserve all accounts, bills,
receipts, books, papers, and documents necessary to substantiate the finan-
cial reports required to be made under this chapter for a period of at least
three (3) years from the date of the filing of the statement containing such
items, which accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents shall
be made available for inspection by the secretary of state at any reasonable
time during such three (3) year period; provided, however, that if a lobbyist
is required under the terms of his employment contract to turn any records
over to his employer or client, responsibility for the preservation of such
records under this subsection shall rest with such employer or client.
(2) A person required to register as a lobbyist shall not:
(a) Engage in any activity as a lobbyist before registering as such;
(b) Knowingly deceive or attempt to deceive any legislator to any fact
pertaining to any pending or proposed legislation;


(c) Cause or influence the introduction of any bill or amendment
thereto for the purpose of thereafter being employed to secure its de-
feat;
(d) Knowingly represent an interest adverse to any of his employers or
clients without first obtaining such employers' or clients' consent
thereto after full disclosure to such employers or clients of such ad-
verse interest;
(e) Exercise any economic reprisal, extortion, or unlawful retalia-
tion upon any legislator by reason of such legislator's position with
respect to, or his vote upon, any pending or proposed legislation; or
(f) Accept any employment as a lobbyist for compensation dependent in
any manner upon the passage or defeat of any proposed or pending legis-
lation or upon any other contingency connected with the action of the
legislature or of either house thereof or of any committee thereof.
This contingent fee prohibition shall also apply to lobbying activities
that pertain to communications with executive officials as defined in
section 74-702(4), Idaho Code.
(3) To ensure proper reporting and identification of the source of ex-
penditures, any public communication made that is reportable as a lobbying
expense under this chapter shall clearly state "Paid for by [the name of the
filing entity, lobbyist's client, or lobbyist's employer]." If the communi-
cation is made for the purpose of soliciting funds, the disclosure shall also
clearly state "This is an attempt to solicit funds."
74-709. DOCKET -- CONTENTS -- REPORTS TO LEGISLATURE -- SUBJECTS OF
LEGISLATION. The secretary of state shall prepare and keep a docket in which
shall be entered the name and business address of each lobbyist, the name
and business address of his employers, and the subjects of legislation, by
bill number, if available, to which the employment relates, which informa-
tion shall also be indexed by names of employers of lobbyists. Such docket
shall be a public record and open to the inspection of any citizen upon de-
mand at any time during the regular business hours of the office of the secre-
tary of state. Beginning with the first week following the beginning of any
regular or special session of the legislature and on every Wednesday there-
after for the duration of such session, the secretary of state shall from his
records report to each house of the legislature the names of lobbyists reg-
istered under this chapter not previously reported, the names of the persons
whom they represent, and subjects of legislation, by bill number, if avail-
able, in which they are interested.
74-710. DUTIES OF SECRETARY OF STATE. (1) The secretary of state is
charged with enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.
(2) In addition to duties otherwise prescribed in this section, it
shall be the duty of the secretary of state:
(a) To prescribe forms for statements and other information required
by this chapter to be filed and to furnish such forms and an instruction
manual to persons required to file such statements and information;
(b) To make statements and other information filed with him available
for public inspection and copying during regular office hours and to
make copying facilities available at a charge not to exceed actual cost;


(c) To preserve such statements and other information for a period of
four (4) years from date of receipt;
(d) To investigate statements filed under the provisions of this chap-
ter, to investigate alleged failures to file any statement required un-
der the provisions of this chapter, and, upon complaint by any person,
to investigate alleged violations of any provision of this chapter;
(e) To report suspected violations of law to the appropriate law en-
forcement authorities;
(f) To prescribe and publish rules, subject to legislative approval, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and
to take such other actions as may be appropriate to carry out the provi-
sions of this chapter; and
(g) To require and prescribe methods for the filing of reports in an
online database established by the secretary of state's office for
the filing and publication of all reports required pursuant to this
chapter. The online database shall accommodate the filings of all
lobbyists. The online database shall be accessible on the secretary
of state's website and be searchable by the public by address, date,
expense, purpose, and any other content deemed appropriate by the sec-
retary of state. The secretary of state may, on an individual basis,
grant a hardship waiver and accept a report required by this chapter
in another format specified by the secretary of state, which shall be
entered into the online database by the secretary of state within three
(3) days of filing.
74-711. STATEMENTS TO BE CERTIFIED. All statements required to be
filed with the secretary of state under this chapter shall be signed and
certified as true and correct by the person required to file such statements.
Electronic signatures and certifications shall be governed by the uniform
electronic transactions act pursuant to chapter 50, title 28, Idaho Code.
74-712. VIOLATIONS -- CIVIL FINE -- MISDEMEANOR PENALTY -- PROSECU-
TION -- LIMITATION -- VENUE. (1) Any person who violates the provisions of
sections 74-703, 74-705, 74-707, 74-708(1), or 74-711, Idaho Code, shall be
liable for a civil fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if an
individual, and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) if a
person other than an individual. The burden of proof for such civil liabil-
ity shall be met by showing a preponderance of the evidence.
(2) Any person who violates the provisions of section 74-708(2), Idaho
Code, and any person who knowingly and willfully violates sections 74-703,
74-705, 74-707, 74-708(1), or 74-711, Idaho Code, is guilty of a misdemeanor
and, upon conviction, in addition to the fines set forth in subsection (1) of
this section, may be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or be both
fined and imprisoned.
(3) The attorney general or the appropriate prosecuting attorney may
prosecute any violations of this chapter.
(4) Prosecution for a civil or misdemeanor violation of this chapter
must be commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the violation
occurred.


(5) Venue for prosecution under the provisions of this chapter shall be
in the county of residence of the defendant if the defendant is a resident of
the state of Idaho, otherwise, venue shall be in Ada county.
74-713. LATE FILING OF REPORT -- FEES. (1) If any person fails to file a
report required under this chapter on or before a specified date, he shall be
liable to the secretary of state for deposit in the general fund in the amount
of fifty dollars ($50.00) per day beginning forty-eight (48) hours after the
deadline until the report is filed. The secretary of state shall notify the
person that a fine has been assessed and will continue to accrue until the
report has been filed. The notification shall be made by telephone or elec-
tronic means within twenty-four (24) hours of the missed filing deadline.
(2) The remedy provided in this section is cumulative and does not ex-
clude any other remedy or penalty prescribed in section 74-712, Idaho Code.
74-714. INJUNCTIONS. The district courts of this state shall have
original jurisdiction to issue injunctions to enforce the provisions of this
chapter upon application by the secretary of state.
74-715. SEVERABILITY. If any provisions of this chapter or its ap-
plication to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of
the chapter or the application of the provision to other persons or circum-
stances shall not be affected.
74-716. CONSTRUCTION. The provisions of this chapter are to be liber-
ally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this chapter. In
the event of conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any other
provision of law, the provisions of this chapter shall govern.
SECTION 11. That Section 18-1356, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-1356. GIFTS TO PUBLIC SERVANTS BY PERSONS SUBJECT TO THEIR JURIS-
DICTION. (1) Regulatory and law enforcement officials. No public servant in
any department or agency exercising regulatory functions, or conducting in-
spections or investigations, or carrying on civil or criminal litigation on
behalf of the government, or having custody of prisoners, shall solicit, ac-
cept or agree to accept any pecuniary benefit from a person known to be sub-
ject to such regulation, inspection, investigation or custody, or against
whom such litigation is known to be pending or contemplated.
(2) Officials concerned with government contracts and pecuniary trans-
actions. No public servant having any discretionary function to perform in
connection with contracts, purchases, payments, claims or other pecuniary
transactions of the government shall solicit, accept or agree to accept any
pecuniary benefit from any person known to be interested in or likely to be-
come interested in any such contract, purchase, payment, claim or transac-
tion.
(3) Judicial and administrative officials. No public servant having
judicial or administrative authority and no public servant employed by or in
a court or other tribunal having such authority, or participating in the en-
forcement of its decisions, shall solicit, accept or agree to accept any pe-


cuniary benefit from a person known to be interested in or likely to become
interested in any matter before such public servant or a tribunal with which
he is associated.
(4) Legislative and executive officials. No legislator or public ser-
vant shall solicit, accept or agree to accept any pecuniary benefit in return
for action on a bill, legislation, proceeding or official transaction from
any person known to be interested in a bill, legislation, official transac-
tion or proceeding.
(5) Exceptions. This section shall not apply to:
(a) fees prescribed by law to be received by a public servant, or any
other benefit for which the recipient gives legitimate consideration or
to which he is otherwise legally entitled; or
(b) gifts or other benefits conferred on account of kinship or other
personal, professional or business relationship independent of the of-
ficial status of the receiver; or
(c) trivial benefits not to exceed a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) in-
cidental to personal, professional or business contacts and involving
no substantial risk of undermining official impartiality; or
(d) benefits received as a result of lobbying activities that are dis-
closed in reports required by chapter 66, title 67, chapter 7, title 74,
Idaho Code. This exception shall not apply to any activities prohibited
by subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
(6) Offering benefits prohibited. No person shall knowingly confer,
or offer or agree to confer, any benefit prohibited by the foregoing subsec-
tions.
(7) Grade of offense. An offense under this section is a misdemeanor
and shall be punished as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 12. That Section 67-6625, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6625. VIOLATIONS -- CIVIL FINE -- MISDEMEANOR PENALTY -- PROSE-
CUTION -- LIMITATION -- VENUE. (1) Any person who violates the provisions
of sections 67-6603, 67-6604, 67-6606 through 67-6614A, 67-6617, 67-6619,
67-6620, 67-6621(1), 67-6624, 67-6627 or 67-6628, Idaho Code, shall be li-
able for a civil fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if an
individual, and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) if a
person other than an individual. The burden of proof for such civil liabil-
ity shall be met by showing a preponderance of the evidence.
(2) Any person who violates section 67-6605 or 67-6621(2), Idaho
Code, and any person who knowingly and willfully violates sections 67-6603
through 67-6614A, 67-6617, 67-6619, 67-6620, 67-6621(1), 67-6624, 67-6627
or 67-6628, Idaho Code, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, in
addition to the fines set forth in subsection (1) of this section, may be
imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or be both fined and imprisoned.
(3) The attorney general or the appropriate prosecuting attorney may
prosecute any violations of this chapter.
(4) Prosecution for a civil or misdemeanor violation of this chapter
must be commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the violation
occurred. Prosecution for a felony violation of this chapter must be com-
menced pursuant to the provisions of section 19-402, Idaho Code.


(5) Venue for prosecution under the provisions of this chapter shall be
in the county of residence of the defendant if the defendant is a resident of
the state of Idaho, otherwise venue shall be in Ada county.
SECTION 13. That Section 74-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-106. RECORDS EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE -- PERSONNEL RECORDS, PER-
SONAL INFORMATION, HEALTH RECORDS, PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINE. The following
records are exempt from disclosure:
(1) Except as provided in this subsection, all personnel records of
a current or former public official other than the public official's pub-
lic service or employment history, classification, pay grade and step,
longevity, gross salary and salary history, including bonuses, severance
packages, other compensation or vouchered and unvouchered expenses for
which reimbursement was paid, status, workplace and employing agency. All
other personnel information relating to a public employee or applicant,
including but not limited to information regarding sex, race, marital sta-
tus, birth date, home address and telephone number, social security number,
driver's license number, applications, testing and scoring materials,
grievances, correspondence and performance evaluations, shall not be dis-
closed to the public without the employee's or applicant's written consent.
Names of applicants to classified or merit system positions shall not be dis-
closed to the public without the applicant's written consent. Disclosure of
names as part of a background check is permitted. Names of the five (5) final
applicants to all other positions shall be available to the public. If such
group is less than five (5) finalists, then the entire list of applicants
shall be available to the public. A public official or authorized represen-
tative may inspect and copy his personnel records, except for material used
to screen and test for employment.
(2) Retired employees' and retired public officials' home addresses,
home telephone numbers and other financial and nonfinancial membership
records; and active and inactive member financial and membership records
and mortgage portfolio loan documents maintained by the public employee re-
tirement system. Financial statements prepared by retirement system staff,
funding agents and custodians concerning the investment of assets of the
public employee retirement system of Idaho are not considered confidential
under this chapter.
(3) Information and records submitted to the Idaho state lottery for
the performance of background investigations of employees, lottery retail-
ers and major procurement contractors; audit records of lottery retailers,
vendors and major procurement contractors submitted to or performed by the
Idaho state lottery; validation and security tests of the state lottery for
lottery games; and business records and information submitted pursuant to
sections 67-7412(8) and (9) and 67-7421(8) and (9), Idaho Code, and such
documents and information obtained and held for the purposes of lottery se-
curity and investigative action as determined by lottery rules, unless the
public interest in disclosure substantially outweighs the private need for
protection from public disclosure.
(4) Records of a personal nature as follows:
(a) Records of personal debt filed with a public agency pursuant to law;


(b) Personal bank records compiled by a public depositor for the pur-
pose of public funds transactions conducted pursuant to law;
(c) Records of ownership of financial obligations and instruments of a
public agency, such as bonds, compiled by the public agency pursuant to
law;
(d) Records with regard to the ownership of or security interests in
registered public obligations;
(e) Vital statistics records;
(f) Military records as described in and pursuant to section 65-301,
Idaho Code;
(g) Social security numbers; and
(h) The following personal data identifiers for an individual may be
disclosed only in the following redacted format:
(i) The initials of any minor children of the individual;
(ii) A date of birth in substantially the following format:
XX/XX/birth year;
(iii) The last four (4) digits of a financial account number in
substantially the following format: XXXXX1234;
(iv) The last four (4) digits of a driver's license number or
state-issued personal identification card number in substan-
tially the following format: XXXXX350F; and
(v) The last four (4) digits of an employer identification number
or business's taxpayer identification number.
(5) Information in an income or other tax return measured by items of
income or sales that is gathered by a public agency for the purpose of admin-
istering the tax, except such information to the extent disclosed in a writ-
ten decision of the tax commission pursuant to a taxpayer protest of a defi-
ciency determination by the tax commission, under the provisions of section
63-3045B, Idaho Code.
(6) Records of a personal nature related directly or indirectly to the
application for and provision of statutory services rendered to persons
applying for public care for people who are elderly, indigent or have mental
or physical disabilities or participation in an environmental or a public
health study, provided the provisions of this subsection making records
exempt from disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or
information contained in those records are necessary for a background check
on an individual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of
firearms, guns or ammunition.
(7) Employment security information, except that a person may agree,
through written, informed consent, to waive the exemption so that a third
party may obtain information pertaining to the person, unless access to the
information by the person is restricted by subsection (3)(a), (b) or (d)
of section 74-113, Idaho Code. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
74-113, Idaho Code, a person may not review identifying information con-
cerning an informant who reported to the department of labor a suspected
violation by the person of the employment security law, chapter 13, title 72,
Idaho Code, under an assurance of confidentiality. As used in this section
and in chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code, "employment security information"
means any information descriptive of an identifiable person or persons that
is received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to or collected by the


department of labor or the industrial commission in the administration of
the employment security law.
(8) Any personal records, other than names, business addresses and
business phone numbers, such as parentage, race, religion, sex, height,
weight, tax identification and social security numbers, financial worth or
medical condition submitted to any public agency pursuant to a statutory
requirement for licensing, certification, permit or bonding.
(9) Unless otherwise provided by agency rule, information obtained as
part of an inquiry into a person's fitness to be granted or retain a license,
certificate, permit, privilege, commission or position and private associ-
ation peer review committee records authorized in title 54, Idaho Code. Any
agency that has records exempt from disclosure under the provisions of this
subsection shall annually make available a statistical summary of the number
and types of matters considered and their disposition.
(10) The records, findings, determinations and decisions of any prelit-
igation screening panel formed under chapters 10 and 23, title 6, Idaho Code.
(11) Complaints received by the board of medicine and investigations
and informal proceedings, including informal proceedings of any committee
of the board of medicine, pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, and
rules adopted thereunder.
(12) Records of the department of health and welfare or a public health
district that identify a person infected with a reportable disease.
(13) Records of hospital care, medical records, including prescrip-
tions, drug orders, records or any other prescription information that
specifically identifies an individual patient, prescription records main-
tained by the board of pharmacy under sections 37-2726 and 37-2730A, Idaho
Code, records of psychiatric care or treatment and professional counseling
records relating to an individual's condition, diagnosis, care or treat-
ment, provided the provisions of this subsection making records exempt from
disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or information
contained in those records are necessary for a background check on an indi-
vidual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of firearms, guns
or ammunition.
(14) Information collected pursuant to the directory of new hires act,
chapter 16, title 72, Idaho Code.
(15) Personal information contained in motor vehicle and driver records
that is exempt from disclosure under the provisions of chapter 2, title 49,
Idaho Code.
(16) Records of the financial status of prisoners pursuant to subsec-
tion (2) of section 20-607, Idaho Code.
(17) Records of the Idaho state police or department of correction re-
ceived or maintained pursuant to section 19-5514, Idaho Code, relating to
DNA databases and databanks.
(18) Records of the department of health and welfare relating to a sur-
vey, resurvey or complaint investigation of a licensed nursing facility.
Such records shall, however, be subject to disclosure as public records as
soon as the facility in question has received the report and no later than the
fourteenth day following the date that department of health and welfare rep-
resentatives officially exit the facility pursuant to federal regulations.
Provided however, that for purposes of confidentiality, no record shall be


released under this section that specifically identifies any nursing facil-
ity resident.
(19) Records and information contained in the registry of immunizations
against childhood diseases maintained in the department of health and wel-
fare, including information disseminated to others from the registry by the
department of health and welfare.
(20) Records of the Idaho housing and finance association (IHFA) relat-
ing to the following:
(a) Records containing personal financial, family, health or similar
personal information submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA;
(b) Records submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA with regard
to obtaining and servicing mortgage loans and all records relating to
the review, approval or rejection by the IHFA of said loans;
(c) Mortgage portfolio loan documents;
(d) Records of a current or former employee other than the employee's
duration of employment with the association, position held and loca-
tion of employment. This exemption from disclosure does not include the
contracts of employment or any remuneration, including reimbursement
of expenses, of the executive director, executive officers or commis-
sioners of the association. All other personnel information relating
to an association employee or applicant, including but not limited to
information regarding sex, race, marital status, birth date, home ad-
dress and telephone number, applications, testing and scoring materi-
als, grievances, correspondence, retirement plan information and per-
formance evaluations, shall not be disclosed to the public without the
employee's or applicant's written consent. An employee or authorized
representative may inspect and copy that employee's personnel records,
except for material used to screen and test for employment or material
not subject to disclosure elsewhere in the Idaho public records act.
(21) Records of the department of health and welfare related to child
support services in cases in which there is reasonable evidence of domestic
violence, as defined in chapter 63, title 39, Idaho Code, that can be used
to locate any individuals in the child support case except in response to a
court order.
(22) Records of the Idaho state bar lawyer assistance program pursuant
to chapter 49, title 54, Idaho Code, unless a participant in the program au-
thorizes the release pursuant to subsection (4) of section 54-4901, Idaho
Code.
(23) Records and information contained in the time-sensitive emergency
registry created by chapter 20, title 57, Idaho Code, together with any re-
ports, analyses and compilations created from such information and records.
(24) Records contained in the court files or other records prepared as
part of proceedings for judicial authorization of sterilization procedures
pursuant to chapter 39, title 39, Idaho Code.
(25) The physical voter registration application on file in the county
clerk's office; however, a redacted copy of said application shall be made
available consistent with the requirements of this section. Information
from the voter registration application maintained in the statewide voter
registration database, including age, will be made available except for
the voter's driver's license number, date of birth and, upon a showing that


the voter comes within the provisions of subsection (30) of this section or
upon showing of good cause by the voter to the county clerk in consultation
with the county prosecuting attorney, the physical residence address of the
voter. For the purposes of this subsection, good cause shall include the
protection of life and property and protection of victims of domestic vio-
lence and similar crimes.
(26) Information in the files of the health care directive registry
maintained by the department of health and welfare under section 39-4515,
Idaho Code, is confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person other
than to the person who executed an advance care planning document or the re-
vocation thereof and that person's surrogate decision-maker, to the person
who registered an advance care planning document or revocation thereof, and
to physicians, hospitals, medical personnel, nursing homes, and other per-
sons who have been granted access to the documents in the registry.
(27) Records in an address confidentiality program participant's file
as provided for in chapter 57, title 19, Idaho Code, other than the address
designated by the secretary of state, except under the following circum-
stances:
(a) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement
agency; or
(b) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order.
(28) Except as otherwise provided by law relating to the release of in-
formation to a governmental entity or law enforcement agency, any personal
information, including but not limited to names, personal and business ad-
dresses and phone numbers, sex, height, weight, date of birth, social secu-
rity and driver's license numbers, or any other identifying numbers or in-
formation related to any Idaho fish and game licenses, permits and tags un-
less written consent is obtained from the affected person.
(29) Documents and records related to alternatives to discipline that
are maintained by the Idaho board of veterinary medicine under the provi-
sions of section 54-2118(1)(b), Idaho Code, provided the requirements set
forth therein are met.
(30) The Idaho residential street address and telephone number of an
eligible law enforcement or judicial officer and such officer's residing
household members as provided for in chapters 58 and 62, title 19, Idaho
Code, except under the following circumstances:
(a) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the court
order;
(b) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement
agency;
(c) If requested by a financial institution or title company for busi-
ness purposes, to the requesting financial institution or title com-
pany; or
(d) If the law enforcement or judicial officer provides written permis-
sion for disclosure of such information.
(31) All information exchanged between the Idaho transportation de-
partment and insurance companies, any database created, all information
contained in the verification system and all reports, responses or other
information generated for the purposes of the verification system, pursuant
to section 49-1234, Idaho Code.


(32) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of information
to the state controller as the state social security administrator as pro-
vided in section 59-1101A, Idaho Code.
(33) Personal information, including but not limited to property val-
ues, personal and business addresses, phone numbers, dates of birth, social
security and driver's license numbers or any other identifying numbers or
information maintained by the administrator of the unclaimed property law
set forth in chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code. Nothing in this subsection
shall prohibit the release of names, last known city of residence, property
value ranges and general property information by the administrator for the
purpose of reuniting unclaimed property with its owner.
(34) Any personal information collected by the secretary of state,
pursuant to section 67-906(1)(b), Idaho Code, for the purpose of allowing
individuals to access the statewide electronic filing system authorized
in section 67-906, Idaho Code, except campaign contact phone numbers for
candidates or committees, which shall be publicly available upon request;
and any notification email addresses submitted as part of a lobbyist's reg-
istration under section 67-6617 74-703, Idaho Code, of an employer, client,
or designated contact for the purpose of electronic notification of that
employer, client, or designated contact of a report filed under section
67-6619 74-705, Idaho Code.
SECTION 14. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.